West Virginia, session 2026, SB726.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 37. MUNICIPAL FINANCIAL STABILIZATION FUND ACT. §8-37-3. Budget stabilization fund; creation; appropriation. (a) A municipality may create a financial stabilization fund by a majority vote of its governing body. The fund may receive appropriations, gifts, grants, and any other funds made available.(b) The governing body may appropriate a sum to the fund from any surplus in the General Fund at the end of each fiscal year or from any other money available.  The Clerk of the Senate and the Clerk of the House of Delegates hereby certify that the foregoing bill is correctly enrolled.  ............................................................... Clerk of the Senate  		............................................................... Clerk of the House of Delegates				                  Originated in the Senate. In effect 90 days from passage.    				............................................................... President of the Senate  						............................................................... Speaker of the House of Delegates  __________   	The within is ................................................ this the........................................... Day of ..........................................................................................................., 2026.  				.............................................................								Governor Bill Status  | Bill Tracking  | Legacy WV Code  | Bulletin Board  | District Maps  | Senate Roster  | House Roster  | Live  | Blog  | Jobs  | Links  | Home